Massachusetts, session 194th, H2991.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The definition of “Employee” in section 1 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following
sentence:- ''Employee'', as applied to persons whose regular compensation is paid by the advisory
board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority established in chapter 161A, shall
mean any person who is engaged in duties which require that the person’s time be devoted to the
service of said advisory board in each year during the ordinary working hours of regular and
permanent employees .
of 2

SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after word “system”, in line 344, the following words:- , the advisory
board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority as established in chapter 161A.
SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after word “District”, in line 390, the following words:- , the advisory
board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority as established in chapter 161A.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “Authority”, in line 16, the following words:- , the advisory
board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority as established in chapter 161A.
of 2